Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.235

Compliance hearings.

For compliance hearings:

(1) Only the respondent is required to appear if the court is reviewing compliance with any conditions of the order. The petitioner may appear at such hearing and provide evidence to the court regarding the respondent's compliance with the order. The petitioner may also file a declaration in response to the respondent's representation of compliance with any conditions of the order. After reviewing such a declaration by the petitioner, the court may ask the petitioner to appear at the hearing or provide additional declaration or documentation to address disputed issues.

(2) Any orders entered by the court pursuant to a compliance hearing must be served on the respondent if the respondent failed to appear at the hearing at which the court entered the orders.

(3) The court shall use its best efforts to notify the petitioner of the outcome of the compliance hearing including, but not limited to, informing the petitioner on whether the respondent is found to be out of compliance with an order to surrender and prohibit weapons. Such notice should be provided to the petitioner by electronic means if possible, but may also be made by telephone or another method that allows notification to be provided without unnecessary delay.

[ 2021 c 215 s 31.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.